Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.040

Petitions—Application of federal Indian child welfare act—Requirements—Federal servicemembers civil relief act statement and findings.

(1)(a) Every petition filed in proceedings under this chapter shall contain a statement alleging whether the child is or may be an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040. If the child is an Indian child, chapter 13.38 RCW shall apply.

(b) Every order or decree entered in any proceeding under this chapter shall contain a finding that the federal Indian child welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW does or does not apply. Where there is a finding that the federal Indian child welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW does apply, the decree or order must also contain a finding that all notice, consent, and evidentiary requirements under the federal Indian child welfare act, chapter 13.38 RCW, and this section have been satisfied.

(c) In proceedings under this chapter, the adoption facilitator shall file a sworn statement documenting efforts to determine whether an Indian child is involved.

(d) Whenever the court or the petitioning party knows or has reason to know that an Indian child is involved in any termination, relinquishment, or placement proceeding under this chapter, the petitioning party shall promptly provide notice to the child's parent or Indian custodian and to the agent designated by the child's Indian tribe to receive such notices. Notice shall be by certified mail with return receipt requested. If the identity or location of the parent or Indian custodian and the tribe cannot be determined, notice shall be given to the secretary of the interior in the manner described in 25 C.F.R. 23.11. If the child may be a member of more than one tribe, the petitioning party shall send notice to all tribes the petitioner has reason to know may be affiliated with the child.

(e) The notice shall: (i) Contain a statement notifying the parent or custodian and the tribe of the pending proceeding; and (ii) notify the tribe of the tribe's right to intervene and/or request that the case be transferred to tribal court.

(f) No termination, relinquishment, or placement proceeding shall be held until at least ten days after receipt of notice by the tribe. If the tribe requests, the court shall grant the tribe up to twenty additional days to prepare for such proceeding.

(2) Every petition filed in proceedings under this chapter shall contain a statement alleging whether the federal servicemembers civil relief act of 2004, 50 U.S.C. Sec. 501 et seq. applies to the proceeding. Every order or decree entered in any proceeding under this chapter shall contain a finding that the federal servicemembers civil relief act of 2004 does or does not apply.

[ 2011 c 309 s 32; 2004 c 64 s 2; 1991 c 136 s 1; 1984 c 155 s 4.]